Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1820
Franchise ordinances; requirements.

No franchise ordinance involving a jurisdictional utility adopted on or after May 31, 2003, shall include provisions contrary to or inconsistent with the State Natural Gas Regulation Act. A city shall file with the commission copies of any such franchise ordinance adopted on or after May 31, 2003, within thirty days of its passage.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 20.